Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1662.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.461, subdivision 27, is amended to read: Subd. 27. deleted text begin State soldiers assistance programdeleted text end new text begin Veterans affairs programsnew text end . Access to information for purposes of verifying eligibility for the State Soldiers Assistance Programnew text begin , the Veterans Stable Housing Initiative, and veterans programsnew text end is governed by section 197.065. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 197.065, is amended to read: 197.065 ACCESS TO DATABASE. new text begin (a)new text end Notwithstanding section 13.46, subdivision 2, the commissioner of veterans affairs may electronically access the MAXIS database maintained by the Department of deleted text begin Human Servicesdeleted text end new text begin Children, Youth, and Familiesnew text end for the purpose of verifying eligibility status of applicants for benefits under the State Soldiers Assistance Programnew text begin , the Veterans Stable Housing Initiative, and veterans programs. The commissioner may electronically access the MAXIS database to ensure that veterans are connected to all available state and federal resources for which the veterans are eligiblenew text end . new text begin (b) In order to access any private data on individuals, as defined by section 13.02, subdivision 12, pursuant to paragraph (a) of this section, the commissioner of veterans affairs must have received informed consent from the subject of that data. new text end